Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 2. Nonstock Corporations.

§§ 13.1-201 through 13.1-300.

Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 522, effective January 1, 1986.

Cross references.

For provisions as to nonstock corporations, see now §§

13.1-801

through

13.1-945

.

Editor’s note.

Sections 13.1-205 and 13.1-209.1 were repealed by Acts 1975, c. 500 and Acts 1981, c. 253, respectively. Section 13.1-247 was also repealed by Acts 1975, c. 500.